District of Columbia statutes.
1-122

Questions to be presented to electors.

For the purpose of this initiative, the District of Columbia Board of Elections is authorized and directed to conduct at the next scheduled general, special, or primary election held after March 10, 1981, an election to fill the positions of delegate at-large and ward delegate to the constitutional convention, as prescribed in § 1-124.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 3, 27 DCR 4732
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-35, § 2(b), 28 DCR 3376
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(k)(1), 59 DCR 1862

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-124.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-112.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-124 substituted “District of Columbia Board of Elections” for “District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(k)(1) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).